California, session 20252026, AB644.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4108.5 is added to the Food and Agricultural Code, to read:4108.5. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.(2) “Department” means the Department of General Services.(3) “Exposition Park” means the Sixth District Agricultural Association, and shall also be known as the Office of Exposition Park Management.(2)(4) “Nonprofit organization” means a recognized nonprofit organization that is tax exempt pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and that represents victims and survivors of the Holocaust.(b) Consistent with funding and authority provided in the annual Budget Act, the agency may enter into a noncompetitive grant with a nonprofit organization, subject to the requirements of this section.(b)A(c) The nonprofit organization, in consultation with the agency, the Legislature, and the department, may plan, construct, and maintain a memorial to the victims and survivors of the Holocaust at Exposition Park in accordance with this section. The memorial shall be consistent with the operating policies and procedures of the Office of Exposition Park Management, including the location of the memorial. The Office of Exposition Park Management shall consult with the Legislature for any issues that may arise between the planning and design of the memorial and the operating policies and procedures at Exposition Park.(d) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the location of the memorial at Exposition Park be conspicuously placed and provide adequate space for visitors to engage the structure.(2) It is the further intent of the Legislature that the following shall be taken into consideration in the design of the memorial: how the memorial can promote further learning and education about the Holocaust and contemporary antisemitism.(c)(e) The agency, department, in consultation with the nonprofit organization, organization and the agency, shall do all of the following:(1) Review the preliminary design plans to identify potential maintenance concerns.(2)Ensure compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and other safety concerns.(3)(2) Review and approve any documents prepared pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).(4)(3) Review final construction documents to ensure that the documents comply with all applicable laws.(5)Prepare the right-of-entry permit outlining the final area of work, final construction documents, construction plans, the contractor hired to perform the work, insurance, bonding, provisions for damage to state property, and inspection requirements.(6)(4) Inspect all construction performed by the contractor selected by the nonprofit organization pursuant to this section.(7)Regularly maintain the memorial in accordance with the agency’s general maintenance responsibilities.(f) The nonprofit organization, in consultation with the Office of Exposition Park Management and Legislature, and with the approval of the agency and department, shall do both of the following:(1) Prepare the right-of-entry permit outlining the final area of work, final construction documents, construction plans, the contractor hired to perform the work, insurance, bonding, provisions for damage to state property, and inspection requirements.(2) Prepare an agreement for the long-term maintenance and security of the memorial.(d)(g) This section shall be implemented only upon appropriation by the Legislature for its purposes in the Budget Act or other statute.